Washington statutes.
RCW 24.36.060

Securities act inapplicable.

No association is subject in any manner to the terms of chapter 21.20 RCW and all associations may issue their membership certificates or stock or other securities as provided in this division without the necessity of any permit from the director of licenses.

[ 1983 c 3 s 27; 1959 c 312 s 6.]